Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 9 Workers' Compensation
11-9-602. Compensation for silicosis or asbestosis.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Asbestosis” means the characteristic fibrotic condition of the lungs caused by the inhalation of asbestos dust; and

“Silicosis” means the characteristic fibrotic condition of the lungs caused by the inhalation of silica dust.

In the absence of conclusive evidence in favor of the claim, disability or death from silicosis or asbestosis shall be presumed not to be due to the nature of any occupation within the provision of this subchapter unless during the ten (10) years immediately preceding the date of disablement the employee has been exposed to the inhalation of silica dust or asbestos dust over a period of not less than five (5) years, two (2) years of which shall have been in this state, under a contract of employment existing in this state. However, if the employee has been employed by the same employer during the whole of the five-year period, his or her right to compensation against the employer shall not be affected by the fact that he or she had been employed during any part of the period outside of this state.

Except as in this subchapter otherwise provided, compensation for disability from uncomplicated silicosis or asbestosis shall be payable in accordance with the provisions of §§ 11-9-519 — 11-9-526. However, no compensation shall be payable for disability from silicosis or asbestosis of less than thirty-three and one-third percent (331/3%) of the total disability.

In case of disability or death from silicosis or asbestosis complicated with tuberculosis of the lungs, compensation shall be payable as for uncomplicated silicosis or asbestosis, provided that the silicosis or asbestosis was an essential factor in the causing of disability or death.

In case of disability or death from silicosis or asbestosis complicated with any other disease, or from any other disease complicated with silicosis or asbestosis, the compensation shall be reduced as provided in § 11-9-601(c).

Where an employee, though not actually disabled, is found by the Workers' Compensation Commission to be affected by silicosis or asbestosis to such a degree as to make it unduly hazardous for him or her to continue in an employment involving exposure to the hazards of the disease, the commission may order that he or she be removed from his or her employment. In such a case, or in case he or she has already been discharged from the employment and is unemployed, he or she shall be entitled to compensation until he or she can obtain steady employment in some other suitable occupation in which there are no hazards of the disease.

However, the compensation shall in no case be payable for longer than twenty-six (26) weeks immediately following the date of removal or discharge and unless application for compensation is made within the period.

In case the employee obtains other suitable employment at reduced wages, the payments of compensation during such part of the twenty-six-week-period as he or she is so employed shall be at the rate prescribed in § 11-9-520.

When in any case the forced change of employment shall, in the opinion of the commission, require that the employee be given special training in order to fit him or her for another occupation, the employer liable for compensation shall pay for the training and incidental traveling expenses an additional sum, in no case, however, to exceed four hundred dollars ($400).

The payment shall be made for the benefit of the employee to such person as the commission shall direct.

No payment, however, shall be made unless the employee accepts the special training directed by the commission, nor shall payment be made for a longer period than the employee submits to the training.

If an employee has been compensated, whether specially trained or not, and thereafter engages in any occupation which exposes him or her to hazards of silicosis or asbestosis without first having obtained the written approval of the commission, neither he or she, his or her dependents, personal representative, nor any other person shall be entitled to compensation or damages for his or her disablement or death from either of the diseases.

However, neither a claim for nor receipt of compensation or benefits under this subsection shall bar the employee from any right to compensation for actual disability from silicosis or asbestosis if the disability results not later and within the time limited in § 11-9-601(g).

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 14, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1227, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1314; reen. Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 11.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

This section was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 11. Acts 1987, No. 834 provided that 1987 legislation reenacting acts passed in the 1976 Extended Session should not repeal any other 1987 legislation and that such other legislation would be controlling in the event of conflict.

11-9-603. Practice and procedure.

Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, procedure with respect to notice of disability or death and as to the filing of claims and determination of claims shall be the same as in cases of accidental injury or death.

Written notice shall be given to the employer of an occupational disease by the employee, or someone in his or her behalf, within ninety (90) days after the first distinct manifestation thereof.

In the case of death from an occupational disease, written notice of death shall also be given to the employer within ninety (90) days thereafter.

An award or denial of award of compensation for an occupational disease may be reviewed and compensation increased, reduced, or terminated where previously awarded, or awarded where previously denied, only upon proof of fraud or undue influence or of change of condition, and then only upon application by a party in interest made not later than one (1) year after the denial of award or, where compensation has been awarded, after the award or the date when the last payment was made under the award, except in cases of silicosis or asbestosis, where the time limit shall be two (2) years.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 14, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1227, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1314; reen. Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 11.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

This section was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 11. Acts 1987, No. 834 provided that 1987 legislation reenacting acts passed in the 1976 Extended Session should not repeal any other 1987 legislation and that such other legislation would be controlling in the event of conflict.

Subchapter 7
— Proceedings Before Workers' Compensation Commission

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§ 11-9-701 — 11-9-715 may not apply to §§ 11-9-716 and 11-9-717, which were enacted subsequently.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1227, § 21: Feb. 13, 1976. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the welfare of both employer and employee is of primary interest and concern to the State of Arkansas; that the maximum benefits presently payable under the Workmen's Compensation law are inadequate due to the steadily increasing cost of living and should be increased immediately to meet said increase in the cost of living; that certain other provisions should be clarified or modified, and that it is in the best interest of both employers and employees that this be accomplished as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 215, § 3: Mar. 1, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Arkansas Supreme Court has invalidated the award of lump sum attorneys fees by the Workers Compensation Commission in instances where the claimant was awarded compensation payable in installments. This has resulted in attorneys fees being paid in minute amounts over a long period of time, and if the claimant dies prior to the attorneys fees being fully recovered from the installment payments, the attorney does not receive full compensation for his efforts. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 252, § 5: July 1, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the expeditious disposition of claims under the Workers' Compensation Law and of judicial review of adjudications made by agencies subject to the Administrative Procedure Act are of great interest and concern to the State of Arkansas and the parties involved in such proceedings; and that the present system of judicial review has not been adequate to insure the prompt and final determination of the issues involved in such matters and, as a result, there has been undue delay to the prejudice of the State and the parties involved. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1979.”

Acts 1979, No. 253, § 12: Mar. 2, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Worker's Compensation law are in urgent need of revision to more clearly define the benefits to be provided by Worker's Compensation coverage; that this Act is designed to provide such clarification and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 822, § 3: Apr. 10, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Second General Assembly that since the Arkansas Court of Appeals does not go into effect until July 1, 1979, it is necessary to delineate in this Act the allowance for legal fees in cases appealed from the Workers Compensation Commission in instances of appeal to the Supreme Court until the Court of Appeals goes into effect and thereafter in instances involving appeals to the Court of Appeals. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 290, § 17: Mar. 3, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is urgent need to clarify the provisions of the Arkansas Workers' Compensation law and to provide improved benefits for persons qualifying under that Act; that this Act is designed to provide such clarification and improved benefits and should be given effect at the earliest possible date. Therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 631, § 5: Mar. 23, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Third General Assembly that the law as to permissible cross appeals to the Workers' Compensation Commission and the Arkansas Court of Appeals is ambiguous and must be clarified immediately to eliminate the possibility of inequitable treatment of parties before these tribunals; that Section 20 of the Workers' Compensation Act should be immediately amended to eliminate internal inconsistency in the Act; and that the scope of the Commission's authority to award attorneys fees on a lump sum basis is unclear and must be immediately clarified. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1986 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 15: July 1, 1986. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the increased benefits and improvements in the administration of the Workers' Compensation system in Arkansas is in the best interest of employees, employers, and the public in general; therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1986.”

Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 21: Apr. 14, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that because of the case Ricarte v. State, CR 86-31, a question has arisen over the validity of Act 1227 of the Extended Session of 1976; that this Act is a reenactment of the former law; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to clarify the state of the law on this issue. Therefore, an emergency is hereby delared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 796, § 41: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Workers' Compensation Law is in immediate need of substantial revision; that this act accomplishes immediate revision; and that this act shall go into effect as soon as is practical which is determined to be July 1, 1993; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted, this act will not go into effect until after July 1, 1993. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993. Furthermore, the provisions of this act shall apply only to injuries which occur after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 2003, No. 227, § 16: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2003 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2003 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2003, No. 1473, § 74: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act includes technical corrects to Act 923 of 2003 which establishes the classification and compensation levels of state employees covered by the provisions of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act; that Act 923 of 2003 will become effective on July 1, 2003; and that to avoid confusion this act must also effective on July 1, 2003. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

11-9-701. Notice of injury or death.

Unless an injury either renders the employee physically or mentally unable to do so, or is made known to the employer immediately after it occurs, the employee shall report the injury to the employer on a form prescribed or approved by the Workers' Compensation Commission and to a person or at a place specified by the employer, and the employer shall not be responsible for disability, medical, or other benefits prior to receipt of the employee's report of injury.

All reporting procedures specified by the employer must be reasonable and shall afford each employee reasonable notice of the reporting requirements.

The foregoing shall not apply when an employee requires emergency medical treatment outside the employer's normal business hours; however, in that event, the employee shall cause a report of the injury to be made to the employer on the employer's next regular business day.

Failure to give the notice shall not bar any claim:

If the employer had knowledge of the injury or death;

If the employee had no knowledge that the condition or disease arose out of and in the course of the employment; or

If the commission excuses the failure on the grounds that for some satisfactory reason the notice could not be given.

Objection to failure to give notice must be made at or before the first hearing on the claim.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 17, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1227, § 14; 1979, No. 253, § 5; 1986 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1317; reen. Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 14.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

This section was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 14. Acts 1987, No. 834 provided that 1987 legislation reenacting acts passed in the 1976 Extended Session should not repeal any other 1987 legislation and that such other legislation would be controlling in the event of conflict.

11-9-702. Filing of claims.

Time for Filing.

A claim for compensation for disability on account of an injury, other than an occupational disease and occupational infection, shall be barred unless filed with the Workers' Compensation Commission within two (2) years from the date of the compensable injury. If during the two-year period following the filing of the claim the claimant receives no weekly benefit compensation and receives no medical treatment resulting from the alleged injury, the claim shall be barred thereafter. For purposes of this section, the date of the compensable injury shall be defined as the date an injury is caused by an accident as set forth in § 11-9-102(4).

A claim for compensation for disability on account of injury which is either an occupational disease or occupational infection shall be barred unless filed with the commission within two (2) years from the date of the last injurious exposure to the hazards of the disease or infection.

However, a claim for compensation for disability on account of silicosis or asbestosis must be filed with the commission within one (1) year after the time of disablement, and the disablement must occur within three (3) years from the date of the last injurious exposure to the hazard of silicosis or asbestosis.

Also, a claim for compensation for disability on account of a disease condition caused by exposure to X rays, radioactive substances, or ionizing radiation only must be filed with the commission within two (2) years from the date the condition is made known to an employee following examination and diagnosis by a medical doctor.

A claim for compensation on account of death shall be barred unless filed with the commission within two (2) years of the date of such a death.

If within six (6) months after the filing of a claim for compensation no bona fide request for a hearing has been made with respect to the claim, the claim may, upon motion and after hearing, be dismissed without prejudice to the refiling of the claim within limitation periods specified in subdivisions (a)(1)-(3) of this section.

Time for Filing Additional Compensation.

In cases in which any compensation, including disability or medical, has been paid on account of injury, a claim for additional compensation shall be barred unless filed with the commission within one (1) year from the date of the last payment of compensation or two (2) years from the date of the injury, whichever is greater.

The time limitations of this subsection shall not apply to claims for the replacement of medicine, crutches, ambulatory devices, artificial limbs, eyeglasses, contact lenses, hearing aids, and other apparatus permanently or indefinitely required as the result of a compensable injury, when the employer or carrier previously furnished such medical supplies, but replacement of such items shall not constitute payment of compensation so as to toll the running of the statute of limitations.

A claim for additional compensation must specifically state that it is a claim for additional compensation. Documents which do not specifically request additional benefits shall not be considered a claim for additional compensation.

If within six (6) months after the filing of a claim for additional compensation no bona fide request for a hearing has been made with respect to the claim, the claim may, upon motion and after hearing, if necessary, be dismissed without prejudice to the refiling of the claim within the limitation period specified in subsection (b) of this section.

Failure to File. Failure to file a claim within the period prescribed in subsection (a) or (b) of this section shall not be a bar to the right unless objection to the failure is made at the first hearing on the claim in which all parties in interest have been given a reasonable notice and opportunity to be heard.

Persons under Disability.

Notwithstanding any statute of limitation provided for in this chapter, when it is established that failure to file a claim by an injured employee or his or her dependents was induced by fraud, the claim may be filed within one (1) year from the time of the discovery of the fraud.

Subsection (a) or (b) of this section shall not apply to a mental incompetent or minor so long as the person has no guardian or similar legal representative. The limitations prescribed in subsection (a) or (b) of this section shall apply to the mental incompetent or minor from the date of the appointment of a guardian or similar legal representative for that person, and when no guardian or similar representative has been appointed, to a minor upon obtainment of majority.

A latent injury or condition shall not delay or toll the limitation periods specified in this section.

However, this subsection shall not apply to the limitation period for occupational diseases specified in subdivision (a)(2) of this section.

The purpose of this section is to provide for a timely hearing on claims for benefits.

The purpose and intent of this section also includes the annulment of any case law inconsistent with this section.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 18, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1963, No. 539, § 3; Init. Meas. 1968, No. 1, § 5, Acts 1969; Acts 1979, No. 108, § 1; 1981, No. 290, § 6; 1986 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1318; Acts 1993, No. 796, § 27.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

11-9-703. Preliminary conference procedure.

The Workers' Compensation Commission is authorized and directed to promulgate appropriate rules to establish and implement, for claims with respect to injuries occurring on or after January 1, 1987, a preliminary conference procedure designed to accomplish the following objectives:

To provide the claimant an opportunity to confer with a legal advisor on the staff of the commission to be advised of his or her rights under this chapter and to ensure that the rights are protected. The conference shall be held in the county where the accident occurred, if the accident occurred in this state, unless otherwise agreed to between the parties, or otherwise directed by the commission;

To provide an opportunity for, but not to compel, a binding settlement of some or all the issues present at the time;

To facilitate the resolution of issues without the expense of litigation or attorney's fees for either party;

To authorize the legal advisor to approve compromise settlements entered into at or as a result of the preliminary conference and those joint petition settlements entered into pursuant to § 11-9-805.

Provided, however, the same legal advisors shall not both advise the claimant and approve the joint petition.

The purpose and intent of this section is to affirm the duty of the commission to provide legal assistance, thereby reducing litigation and workers' compensation costs; and

No moneys appropriated by Acts 1987, No. 1046, or any other act shall be expended to fund preliminary conferences held pursuant to § 11-9-102,§ 11-9-205, §§ 11-9-501 — 11-9-503,§ 11-9-517,§ 11-9-521,§ 11-9-522,§ 11-9-527,§§ 11-9-701 — 11-9-704,§ 11-9-715,§ 11-9-802, or § 11-9-804, other than in the county where the accident occurred, if the accident occurred in this state, the county of the claimant's residence, or such other county as agreed to by the parties.

History.

Acts 1986 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1323.1; Acts 1993, No. 796, § 28; 2003, No. 227, § 10; 2019, No. 315, § 796.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided, in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in the introductory language.

11-9-704. Proceedings on claims.

Notice. Within ten (10) days after a claim for compensation has been filed, the Workers' Compensation Commission shall notify the employer and any other interested person of the filing of the claim.

Investigation — Hearing.

The commission shall make or cause to be made such investigation as it considers necessary in respect to the claim, and upon application of any interested party, or on its own motion, shall order a hearing.

An application for a hearing must set forth clearly the specific issues of fact or law in controversy and the contentions of the party applying for the hearing.

If any party is not represented by a lawyer, the administrative law judge shall define the issues to be heard.

If a hearing on the claim is ordered, the commission shall give the claimant and other interested parties ten (10) days' notice of the hearing served personally upon the claimant and other parties, or by registered mail.

The hearing shall be held in the county where the accident occurred, if the accident occurred in this state, unless otherwise agreed to between the parties, or otherwise directed by the commission. If the accident occurred without the State of Arkansas, and is one for which compensation is payable under this subchapter, the hearing may be held in the county of the employer's residence or place of business, or any other county in the State of Arkansas which will, in the discretion of the commission, be most convenient for the hearing.

The award, together with the statement of the findings of fact and other matters pertinent to the issues, shall be filed with the record of the proceedings, and a copy of the award shall immediately be sent to the parties in dispute or to their attorneys.

If an application for review is filed in the office of the commission within thirty (30) days from the date of the receipt of the award, the full commission shall review the evidence or, if deemed advisable, hear the parties, their representatives, and witnesses, and shall make awards, together with its rulings of law, and file same in like manner as specified in the foregoing.

A copy of the award made on review shall immediately be sent to the parties in dispute, or to their attorneys.

The full commission may remand to a single member of the commission or administrative law judge any case before the full commission for the purpose of taking additional evidence. The evidence shall be delivered to the full commission and shall be taken into consideration before rendering any decision or award in the case.

Evidence and Construction.

At the hearing the claimant and the employer may each present evidence in respect of the claim and may be represented by any person authorized in writing for such purpose.

The evidence may include verified medical reports which shall be accorded such weight as may be warranted from all the evidence of the case.

Any determination of the existence or extent of physical impairment shall be supported by objective and measurable physical or mental findings.

When deciding any issue, administrative law judges and the commission shall determine, on the basis of the record as a whole, whether the party having the burden of proof on the issue has established it by a preponderance of the evidence.

Administrative law judges, the commission, and any reviewing courts shall construe the provisions of this chapter strictly.

In determining whether a party has met the burden of proof on an issue, administrative law judges and the commission shall weigh the evidence impartially and without giving the benefit of the doubt to any party.

Order. The order denying the claim or making the award shall be filed in the office of the commission, and a copy shall be sent by registered mail to the claimant and to the employer or to their attorneys.

Award after Death.

No compensation for disability of an injured employee shall be payable for any period beyond his or her death.

However, an award of compensation for disability may be made after the death of the injured employee for the period of disability preceding death.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 23, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1981, No. 290, § 10; 1986 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1323; Acts 1991, No. 786, § 10; 1993, No. 796, § 29.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1991, No. 786, § 37, provided, “The enactment and adoption of this Act shall not repeal, expressly or impliedly, the acts passed at the regular session of the 78th General Assembly. All such acts shall have full effect and, so far as those acts intentionally vary from or conflict with any provision contained in this Act, those acts shall have the effect of subsequent acts and as amending or repealing the appropriate parts of the Arkansas Code of 1987.”

11-9-705. Nature of proceedings generally.

Conduct of Hearing or Inquiry.

In making an investigation or inquiry or conducting a hearing, the Workers' Compensation Commission shall not be bound by technical or statutory rules of evidence or by technical or formal rules of procedure, except as provided by this chapter, but may make such investigation or inquiry, or conduct the hearing, in a manner as will best ascertain the rights of the parties.

Declarations of a deceased employee concerning the injury in respect of which the investigation or inquiry is being made, or the hearing conducted, may be received in evidence and may, if corroborated by other evidence, be sufficient to establish the injury.

When deciding any issue, administrative law judges and the commission shall determine, on the basis of the record as a whole, whether the party having the burden of proof on the issue has established it by a preponderance of evidence.

Hearings to be Public — Records.

Hearings before the commission shall be open to the public and shall be stenographically reported, and the commission is authorized to contract for the reporting of the hearings.

The commission shall by rule provide for the preparation of a record of all hearings and other proceedings before it.

However, the commission shall not be required to stenographically report or prepare a record of joint petition hearings. Instead, the administrative law judge or legal advisor shall tape the hearing at no cost to the parties.

Introduction of Evidence.

All oral evidence or documentary evidence shall be presented to the designated representative of the commission at the initial hearing on a controverted claim, which evidence shall be stenographically reported.

Each party shall present all evidence at the initial hearing.

Further hearings for the purpose of introducing additional evidence will be granted only at the discretion of the hearing officer or commission.

A request for a hearing for the introduction of additional evidence must show the substance of the evidence desired to be presented.

Any party proposing to introduce medical reports or testimony of physicians at the hearing of a controverted claim shall, as a condition precedent to the right to do so, furnish to the opposing party and to the commission copies of the written reports of the physicians of their findings and opinions at least seven (7) days prior to the date of the hearing. However, if no written reports are available to a party, then the party shall, in lieu of furnishing the report, notify in writing the opposing party and the commission of the name and address of the physicians proposed to be used as witnesses at least seven (7) days prior to the hearing and the substance of their anticipated testimony.

If the opposing party desires to cross-examine the physician, he or she should notify the party who submits a medical report to him or her as soon as practicable, in order that he or she may make every effort to have the physician present for the hearing.

A party failing to observe the requirements of this subsection may not be allowed to introduce medical reports or testimony of physicians at a hearing, except in the discretion of the hearing officer or the commission.

The time periods may be waived by the consent of the parties.

Expert testimony shall not be allowed unless it satisfies the requirements of Federal Rule of Evidence 702 with annotations and amendments, that is, Daubert v. Merrell-Dow Pharmaceuticals, Inc., 509 U.S. 579 (1993), and Kumho Tire Co. v. Carmichael, 526 U.S. 137 (1999).

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 27, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1981, No. 290, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1327; Acts 1993, No. 796, § 30; 2001, No. 1281, § 4; 2019, No. 315, § 797.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “or regulation” following “rule” in (b)(1)(B).

11-9-706. Conduct of proceedings — Contempt.

The Workers' Compensation Commission shall have the power to preserve and enforce order during any proceeding had before it, to issue subpoenas for and administer oaths to and compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses, and require the production of books, papers, documents, and other evidence.

If any person or party in proceedings before the commission disobeys or resists any lawful order or process, or misbehaves during a hearing, or so near the place thereof so as to obstruct the hearing or neglects to produce, after having been ordered to do so, any book, paper, or document, or refuses to appear after having been subpoenaed, or upon appearing refuses to take oath as a witness, or after having taken the oath refuses to be examined according to law, or refuses to comply with any final order of an administrative law judge or the commission, or willfully refuses to pay an uncontroverted medical or related expense within forty-five (45) days after the respondent has received the statement, then the person or party, at the discretion of the administrative law judge or the commission, may be found to be in contempt of the commission and may be subject to a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 31, Acts 1949, p. 1420; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1331; Acts 1995, No. 1230, § 1.

11-9-707. Presumptions.

In any proceeding for the enforcement of a claim for compensation, the following prima facie presumptions shall exist:

That the Workers' Compensation Commission has jurisdiction;

That sufficient notice was given; and

That the injury was not occasioned by the willful intention of the injured employee to bring about the injury of himself or herself or another.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 24, Acts 1949, p. 1420; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1324; Acts 1993, No. 796, § 3.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

11-9-708. Depositions.

The Workers' Compensation Commission may cause depositions of witnesses to be taken in such manner as it may direct.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 28, Acts 1949, p. 1420; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1328.

11-9-709. Witness fees.

Each witness who appears in obedience to a subpoena shall be entitled to the same fees as witnesses in a civil action in the circuit court.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 29, Acts 1949, p. 1420; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1329.

11-9-710. Attorneys.

Where the Workers' Compensation Commission is a party to or is otherwise interested in a court proceeding under this chapter, it may employ attorneys to appear in its behalf.

If requested by the commission, it shall be the duty of the Attorney General or the prosecuting attorneys of the different circuits to represent the commission without extra compensation.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 25, Acts 1949, p. 1420; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1325.